District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.13

Obstruction of roads.

It is forbidden to occupy the roads in said United States Capitol Grounds in such manner as to obstruct or hinder their proper use, or to use the roads in the area of said United States Capitol Grounds, south of Constitution Avenue and B Street and north of Independence Avenue and B Street, for the conveyance of goods or merchandise, except to or from the Capitol on government service.

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 718, ch. 707, § 3
This section is referenced in § 10-503.18.
1981 Ed., § 9-109.
1973 Ed., § 9-120.